Hawaii, session 2026, HB1450.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that in 2024, the department of agriculture launched a statewide "Go B.I.G. (Buy, Invest, Grow) for Agriculture" initiative to encourage buying local products, invest in the State's agricultural development, and grow the scale of agricultural operations in the State.  As part of the initiative, agricultural producers were surveyed to identify the agricultural industry's top challenges. Based on the data collected, the high cost of equipment poses a major barrier to agricultural growth. The legislature further finds that agricultural producers require capital to purchase technology and other equipment necessary for their operations.  The legislature believes that by investing in the agricultural supply chain, the State can increase local food production, enhance climate resilience, improve food security, and support the economic growth of small- to mid-sized farms. The purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Establish a three-year climate-resilient food systems grant pilot program; and (2)  Appropriate funds for the pilot program. SECTION 2.  (a) There is established a three-year climate-resilient food systems grant pilot program, which shall be administered by the department of agriculture. (b)  The climate-resilient food systems grant pilot program shall provide grants to agricultural producers in the State, in an amount ranging from $10,000 to $100,000, for the acquisition of special-purpose equipment, technology, and ancillary costs. (c)  Grants shall be awarded on a competitive basis through a request for applications, in compliance with rules adopted pursuant to chapter 91, Hawaii Revised Statutes, and chapter 103D, Hawaii Revised Statutes. (d)  Grant proposals shall be submitted to the department of agriculture in accordance with administrative rules adopted by the department to administer the grant program. Each request shall, at a minimum, state: (1)  The name of the farmer or rancher requesting grant funds; (2)  That the applicant is engaged in expanding production capacity of the applicant's agricultural or value-added products; and (3)  How the applicant intends to use the grant for projects that demonstrate a significant impact on local agriculture production and enhance the economic viability of small family farms or ranches. (e) Each applicant for a grant shall provide proof that the applicant: (1)  Has United States citizenship or permanent United States resident alien status and is a resident or domiciliary of the State at the time of application; (2)  Grows or produces raw or processed agricultural products on a small family farm or ranch in the State at the time of the application; (3)  Complies with all other federal, state, or county statutes, rules, or ordinances necessary to conduct the activities or provide the services for which a grant is awarded, including the United States Food and Drug Administration Food Safety Modernization Act, P.L. 111-353, and that Act's provisions on supplier verification; (4)  Complies with all applicable federal and state laws prohibiting discrimination against a person on the basis of race, color, national origin, religion, creed, sex, age, sexual orientation, or disability; (5)  Agrees not to use state funds for travel, conferences, entertainment, perquisites, or lobbying activities; (6)  Allows the department, legislative committees and their staff, and the auditor full access to the applicant's records, reports, files, and other related documents and information for the purposes of monitoring, measuring the effectiveness of, and ensuring the proper expenditure of the grant; (7)  Agrees to indemnify and hold harmless the State and any of its officers, agents, and employees from and against any and all claims arising out of or resulting from activities carried out or projects undertaken with funds provided by this Act, and procure sufficient insurance to provide this indemnification if requested to do so by the department of agriculture; (8)  Satisfies any other standards that may be required by the source of funding; and (9)  Meets all other standards prescribed in rules adopted by the department to implement the grants awarded under this section. (f)  No grant shall be awarded under this Act unless the applicant matches up to twenty per cent of the total project costs. (g)  For the purposes of this Act, "small family farm or ranch" means any farm or ranch where the majority of the business is owned by the producer and individuals related to the producer and with a gross cash farm or ranch income of less than $350,000 per year. (h)  The climate-resilient food systems grant pilot program shall terminate on June 30, 2028. SECTION 3.  (a) The department of agriculture shall submit interim reports to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular sessions of 2026 and 2027.  The interims reports shall include: (1)  The department's progress on the implementation of this Act; (2)  Preliminary results of the climate-resilient food systems grant pilot program, including the number of grants awarded each year; and (3)  Any findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation. (b)  The department of agriculture shall submit a final report of its administrative activities, expenditures, findings, and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2028.  The report shall include the outcomes of the climate-resilient food systems grant pilot program and a recommendation as to whether the program should be made permanent, with or without modifications. SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $3,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to carry out the purposes of this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of agriculture for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________